Rhode Island, session 2025, SB289.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 8-16.1-7 of the General Laws in Chapter 8-16.1 entitled "Judicial
Selection" is hereby amended to read as follows:
8-16.1-7. Tenure of justices.
(a) The justices of the supreme court, the superior court, the family court, the district court,
the workers’ compensation court, and the traffic tribunal shall hold office during good behavior.
(b) Any justice and magistrate of the superior court, the family court, the district court, the
workers’ compensation court, and the traffic tribunal initially appointed after July 1, 2025, shall
hold office during good behavior, provided, however, that upon attaining the age of seventy-five
(75), shall be mandated to retire.
(c) The provisions of subsection (b) of this section shall not prohibit the justices and
magistrates of the superior court, the family court, the district court, the workers’ compensation
court, and the traffic tribunal from service after retirement pursuant to § 8-3-10.
(d) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (b) of this section, the provisions of §§ 8-
3-7, 8-3-8, 8-3-11, 8-8.2-6 and 8-8.2-9 and any other law providing for retirement of a justice of
any court of this state, shall remain in full force and effect.
(e) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (b) of this section, whenever any justice
has reached the mandatory age of retirement as provided herein, and has served in judicial office
without having reached the prescribed tenure or years of service that would entitle them to
retirement benefits, the supreme court shall recommend that their pension rights be accelerated to

become effective as of the date of their retirement. The supreme court shall forward the
recommendation to the general assembly for appropriate legislative action in order that the justice’s
pension benefits be so accelerated.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
========
LC000555
========
LC000555 - Page 2 of 3